Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.640.040

Civil relief for violations.

Any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter, or aggrieved by the violation of any regulation or guideline adopted hereunder, shall have a right of action in superior court for civil damages and such equitable relief as the court shall determine.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.85.040.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 226: See note following RCW 28A.640.010.